Illinois, session 104th, SB2912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Broker fees.8    (a) A real estate broker or rental agent who rents or 9leases residential real estate as an agent of a landowner, 10landlord, lessor, or sublessor may not demand, receive, or 11retain any payment, fee, commission, or other charge from a 12tenant or prospective tenant for any services for the listing, 13showing, qualifying of prospective tenants, preparation and 14execution of documents, or other action arising out of the 15leasing of a residential rental property.16    (b) A landowner, landlord, lessor, or sublessor may not 17demand or require that a tenant or prospective tenant retain, 18hire, or engage a real estate broker or rental agent and pay 19the real estate broker or rental agent a fee or commission as a 20condition to applying for or leasing a residential rental 21unit. A landowner, landlord, lessor, or sublessor may not 22demand or require that a tenant or prospective tenant make any 23payment in violation of subsection (a) of this Section.  SB2912- 2 -LRB104 16681 JRC 30085 b1    (c) A tenant or prospective tenant alleging a violation of 2this Section may bring a civil action against the person or 3entity that is alleged to have violated this Section. The 4court may award the tenant or prospective tenant injunctive 5relief, monetary relief, attorney's fees, and costs.